Utah statutes.
4-2-12.   Notice of violation -- Order for corrective action.
(1)  Whenever the department determines that any person, or any officer or
employee of any person, is violating any requirement of this title or rules
adopted under this title, the department shall serve written notice upon the
alleged violator which specifies the violation and alleges the facts
constituting the violation.
(2)  After serving notice as required in Subsection (1), the department may
issue an order for necessary corrective action and request the attorney
general or the county attorney or the district attorney to seek injunctive
relief and enforcement of the order as provided in Subsection 4-2-11 (2).
